Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CITY OF BLAINE.new text end new text begin $7,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for one or more grants to the city of Blaine, Anoka County, or both, for local road improvements associated with the construction of intersection improvements along marked Trunk Highway 65 in the city of Blaine, including temporary local road improvements to mitigate construction-related traffic. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end